Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1628.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 441.10. Pregnancy-related and Postpartum Medical Assistance.--(a) Subject to any necessary Federal approval:(1) A woman receiving medical assistance under section 1902(e)(5) of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(e)(5)) shall be eligible for pregnancy-related and postpartum medical assistance for up to an additional twelve months following the birth of the child or a pregnancy that ends in a loss . 123456789101112131415161718 (2) A woman shall be eligible for additional pregnancy-related and postpartum medical assistance under paragraph (1) if the woman:(i) Is eligible for medical assistance at the time of delivery.(ii) Is not otherwise eligible for medical assistance.(iii) Has income less than two hundred fifteen percent of the Federal poverty income guidelines.(b) The department shall seek a State plan amendment or Federal waiver under section 1115 of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1315) from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, if needed, or apply for subsequent extensions of the waiver as necessary for the provision of pregnancy-related and postpartum medical assistance under this section.(c) If the initial application or subsequent extension for the waiver under subsection (b) does not receive Federal approval, the secretary shall, no later than 180 days after failure to receive Federal approval under subsection (b) is received, submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly detailing ways the application can be updated to receive Federal approval. The report and application for the waiver shall be updated and resubmitted until the application receives Federal approval.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB1628PN2733 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324